trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 538 Y 5
SFX 538 0 k/180 . 278
SFX 538 0 k/180 . 278
SFX 538 0 kmA/180 . 278
SFX 538 0 km/180 . 278
SFX 538 0 kn/180 . 278
SFX 532 Y 7
SFX 532 0 h/182 . 257
SFX 532 0 hmA/182 . 257
SFX 532 0 hm/182 . 257
SFX 532 0 hA/182 . 257
SFX 532 0 hn/182 . 257
SFX 532 0 ny/182 . 257
SFX 532 0 nA/182 . 257
SFX 57 Y 22
SFX 57 0 h/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 hmA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 hm/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 hA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 hn/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 k/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 k/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 kmA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 km/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 kn/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 ny/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 nA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Ah/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 AhmA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Ahm/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 AhA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Ahn/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Ak/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Ak/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 AkmA/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Akm/161 . 279
SFX 57 0 Akn/161 . 279
SFX 555 Y 7
SFX 555 0 h/155 . 276
SFX 555 0 hmA/155 . 276
SFX 555 0 hm/155 . 276
SFX 555 0 hA/155 . 276
SFX 555 0 hn/155 . 276
SFX 555 0 ny/155 . 276
SFX 555 0 nA/155 . 276
SFX 549 Y 7
SFX 549 0 h/183 . 276
SFX 549 0 hmA/183 . 276
SFX 549 0 hm/183 . 276
SFX 549 0 hA/183 . 276
SFX 549 0 hn/183 . 276
SFX 549 0 ny/183 . 276
SFX 549 0 nA/183 . 276
SFX 556 Y 5
SFX 556 0 k/155 . 278
SFX 556 0 k/155 . 278
SFX 556 0 kmA/155 . 278
SFX 556 0 km/155 . 278
SFX 556 0 kn/155 . 278
SFX 550 Y 5
SFX 550 0 k/183 . 278
SFX 550 0 k/183 . 278
SFX 550 0 kmA/183 . 278
SFX 550 0 km/183 . 278
SFX 550 0 kn/183 . 278
SFX 63 Y 12
SFX 63 0 wh/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 whmA/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 whm/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 whA/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 whn/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wk/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wk/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wkmA/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wkm/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wkn/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wny/161 . 280
SFX 63 0 wnA/161 . 280
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 0/184 . 228
SFX 239 Y 12
SFX 239 0 |th/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |thmA/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |thm/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |thA/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |thn/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |tk/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |tk/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |tkmA/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |tkm/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |tkn/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |ty/156 . 253
SFX 239 0 |tnA/156 . 253
SFX 442 Y 7
SFX 442 0 wh/175 . 249
SFX 442 0 whmA/175 . 249
SFX 442 0 whm/175 . 249
SFX 442 0 whA/175 . 249
SFX 442 0 whn/175 . 249
SFX 442 0 wny/175 . 249
SFX 442 0 wnA/175 . 249
SFX 221 Y 12
SFX 221 0 th/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 thmA/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 thm/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 thA/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 thn/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 tk/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 tk/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 tkmA/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 tkm/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 tkn/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 ty/167 . 274
SFX 221 0 tnA/167 . 274
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 p/154 . 242
SFX 569 Y 5
SFX 569 0 h/184 . 234
SFX 569 0 hmA/184 . 234
SFX 569 0 hm/184 . 234
SFX 569 0 hA/184 . 234
SFX 569 0 hn/184 . 234
SFX 443 Y 5
SFX 443 0 wk/175 . 250
SFX 443 0 wk/175 . 250
SFX 443 0 wkmA/175 . 250
SFX 443 0 wkm/175 . 250
SFX 443 0 wkn/175 . 250
SFX 308 Y 45
SFX 308 0 h/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hm/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 h/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hm/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 h/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hm/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 hn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 k/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 k/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 kmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 km/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 kn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 ny/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 ny/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAh/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAhmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAhm/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAhA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAhn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAny/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mAnA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwh/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwhmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwhm/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwhA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwhn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwny/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 mwnA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nh/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nhmA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nhm/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nhA/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nhn/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nny/157 . 225
SFX 308 0 nnA/157 . 225
SFX 242 Y 13
SFX 242 0 tA/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAh/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAhmA/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAhm/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAhA/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAhn/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAk/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAk/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAkmA/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAkm/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAkn/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAy/156 . 273
SFX 242 0 tAnA/156 . 273
SFX 570 Y 5
SFX 570 0 k/184 . 236
SFX 570 0 k/184 . 236
SFX 570 0 kmA/184 . 236
SFX 570 0 km/184 . 236
SFX 570 0 kn/184 . 236
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 wn/175 . 254
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 0 tAn/156 . 229
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 0/185 . 228
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 At/154 . 251
SFX 318 Y 5
SFX 318 0 h/186 . 234
SFX 318 0 hmA/186 . 234
SFX 318 0 hm/186 . 234
SFX 318 0 hA/186 . 234
SFX 318 0 hn/186 . 234
SFX 319 Y 5
SFX 319 0 k/186 . 236
SFX 319 0 k/186 . 236
SFX 319 0 kmA/186 . 236
SFX 319 0 km/186 . 236
SFX 319 0 kn/186 . 236
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 n/146 . 255
SFX 133 Y 12
SFX 133 0 h/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 hmA/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 hm/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 hA/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 hn/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 k/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 k/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 kmA/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 km/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 kn/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 ny/145 . 281
SFX 133 0 nA/145 . 281
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 A/150 . 239
SFX 47 Y 12
SFX 47 0 h/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 hmA/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 hm/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 hA/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 hn/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 k/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 k/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 kmA/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 km/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 kn/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 ny/161 . 281
SFX 47 0 nA/161 . 281
SFX 135 Y 12
SFX 135 0 Ah/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 AhmA/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Ahm/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 AhA/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Ahn/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Ak/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Ak/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 AkmA/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Akm/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Akn/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 Any/145 . 282
SFX 135 0 AnA/145 . 282
SFX 559 Y 2
SFX 559 0 ny/187 . 230
SFX 559 0 nA/187 . 230
SFX 138 Y 2
SFX 138 0 t/145 . 283
SFX 138 0 tA/145 . 283
SFX 49 Y 12
SFX 49 0 Ah/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 AhmA/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Ahm/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 AhA/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Ahn/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Ak/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Ak/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 AkmA/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Akm/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Akn/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 Any/161 . 282
SFX 49 0 AnA/161 . 282
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 p/159 . 242
SFX 52 Y 2
SFX 52 0 t/161 . 283
SFX 52 0 tA/161 . 283
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 y/159 . 284
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 yn/146 . 260
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 At/159 . 251
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 0/176 . 228
SFX 40 Y 13
SFX 40 0 y/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yh/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yhmA/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yhm/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yhA/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yhn/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yk/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 yk/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 ykmA/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 ykm/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 ykn/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 y/161 . 247
SFX 40 0 ynA/161 . 247
SFX 490 Y 7
SFX 490 0 Ah/144 . 233
SFX 490 0 AhmA/144 . 233
SFX 490 0 Ahm/144 . 233
SFX 490 0 AhA/144 . 233
SFX 490 0 Ahn/144 . 233
SFX 490 0 Any/144 . 233
SFX 490 0 AnA/144 . 233
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 0 |t/146 . 285
SFX 487 Y 7
SFX 487 0 nh/188 . 286
SFX 487 0 nhmA/188 . 286
SFX 487 0 nhm/188 . 286
SFX 487 0 nhA/188 . 286
SFX 487 0 nhn/188 . 286
SFX 487 0 nny/188 . 286
SFX 487 0 nnA/188 . 286
SFX 491 Y 5
SFX 491 0 Ak/144 . 287
SFX 491 0 Ak/144 . 287
SFX 491 0 AkmA/144 . 287
SFX 491 0 Akm/144 . 287
SFX 491 0 Akn/144 . 287
SFX 475 Y 7
SFX 475 0 nh/189 . 286
SFX 475 0 nhmA/189 . 286
SFX 475 0 nhm/189 . 286
SFX 475 0 nhA/189 . 286
SFX 475 0 nhn/189 . 286
SFX 475 0 nny/189 . 286
SFX 475 0 nnA/189 . 286
SFX 488 Y 5
SFX 488 0 nk/188 . 288
SFX 488 0 nk/188 . 288
SFX 488 0 nkmA/188 . 288
SFX 488 0 nkm/188 . 288
SFX 488 0 nkn/188 . 288
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 An/144 . 237
SFX 476 Y 5
SFX 476 0 nk/189 . 288
SFX 476 0 nk/189 . 288
SFX 476 0 nkmA/189 . 288
SFX 476 0 nkm/189 . 288
SFX 476 0 nkn/189 . 288
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 n/145 . 255
SFX 327 Y 5
SFX 327 0 h/190 . 234
SFX 327 0 hmA/190 . 234
SFX 327 0 hm/190 . 234
SFX 327 0 hA/190 . 234
SFX 327 0 hn/190 . 234
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 tyn/145 . 268
SFX 328 Y 5
SFX 328 0 k/190 . 236
SFX 328 0 k/190 . 236
SFX 328 0 kmA/190 . 236
SFX 328 0 km/190 . 236
SFX 328 0 kn/190 . 236
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 A/145 . 289
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 nA/161 . 290
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 0 0/150 . 262
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 0 y/161 . 291
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 A/145 . 292
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 |t/191 . 285
SFX 340 Y 2
SFX 340 0 ny/185 . 230
SFX 340 0 nA/185 . 230
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 0/167 . 228
SFX 163 Y 5
SFX 163 0 k/145 . 293
SFX 163 0 k/145 . 293
SFX 163 0 kmA/145 . 293
SFX 163 0 km/145 . 293
SFX 163 0 kn/145 . 293
SFX 224 Y 11
SFX 224 0 h/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 hmA/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 hm/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 hA/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 hn/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 k/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 k/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 kmA/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 km/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 kn/167 . 294
SFX 224 0 nA/167 . 294
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 0 0/145 . 295
SFX 140 Y 2
SFX 140 0 n/145 . 296
SFX 140 0 nA/145 . 296
SFX 300 Y 24
SFX 300 0 th/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 thmA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 thm/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 thA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 thn/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tk/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tk/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tkmA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tkm/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tkn/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tny/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tnA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAh/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAhmA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAhm/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAhA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAhn/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAk/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAk/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAkmA/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAkm/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAkn/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAny/157 . 266
SFX 300 0 tAnA/157 . 266
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 0/192 . 228
SFX 144 Y 6
SFX 144 0 t/145 . 297
SFX 144 0 t/145 . 297
SFX 144 0 t/145 . 297
SFX 144 0 tmA/145 . 297
SFX 144 0 tm/145 . 297
SFX 144 0 tn/145 . 297
SFX 502 Y 7
SFX 502 0 Ah/153 . 233
SFX 502 0 AhmA/153 . 233
SFX 502 0 Ahm/153 . 233
SFX 502 0 AhA/153 . 233
SFX 502 0 Ahn/153 . 233
SFX 502 0 Any/153 . 233
SFX 502 0 AnA/153 . 233
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 0 wA/193 . 252
SFX 330 Y 5
SFX 330 0 h/179 . 234
SFX 330 0 hmA/179 . 234
SFX 330 0 hm/179 . 234
SFX 330 0 hA/179 . 234
SFX 330 0 hn/179 . 234
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 0/194 . 228
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 wA/195 . 252
SFX 503 Y 5
SFX 503 0 Ak/153 . 287
SFX 503 0 Ak/153 . 287
SFX 503 0 AkmA/153 . 287
SFX 503 0 Akm/153 . 287
SFX 503 0 Akn/153 . 287
SFX 331 Y 5
SFX 331 0 k/179 . 236
SFX 331 0 k/179 . 236
SFX 331 0 kmA/179 . 236
SFX 331 0 km/179 . 236
SFX 331 0 kn/179 . 236
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 An/153 . 237
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 0/145 . 298
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 A/166 . 239
SFX 35 Y 12
SFX 35 0 th/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 thmA/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 thm/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 thA/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 thn/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 tk/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 tk/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 tkmA/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 tkm/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 tkn/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 ty/161 . 274
SFX 35 0 tnA/161 . 274
SFX 126 Y 13
SFX 126 0 y/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yh/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yhmA/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yhm/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yhA/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yhn/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yk/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 yk/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 ykmA/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 ykm/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 ykn/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 y/145 . 247
SFX 126 0 ynA/145 . 247
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 yn/178 . 269
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 0/196 . 228
SFX 354 Y 7
SFX 354 0 yh/197 . 299
SFX 354 0 yhmA/197 . 299
SFX 354 0 yhm/197 . 299
SFX 354 0 yhA/197 . 299
SFX 354 0 yhn/197 . 299
SFX 354 0 yny/197 . 299
SFX 354 0 ynA/197 . 299
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 0/146 . 228
SFX 99 Y 13
SFX 99 0 0/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 h/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 hmA/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 hm/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 hA/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 hn/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 k/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 k/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 kmA/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 km/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 kn/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 y/145 . 300
SFX 99 0 nA/145 . 300
SFX 367 Y 7
SFX 367 0 wnh/149 . 244
SFX 367 0 wnhmA/149 . 244
SFX 367 0 wnhm/149 . 244
SFX 367 0 wnhA/149 . 244
SFX 367 0 wnhn/149 . 244
SFX 367 0 wnny/149 . 244
SFX 367 0 wnnA/149 . 244
SFX 368 Y 5
SFX 368 0 wnk/149 . 248
SFX 368 0 wnk/149 . 248
SFX 368 0 wnkmA/149 . 248
SFX 368 0 wnkm/149 . 248
SFX 368 0 wnkn/149 . 248
SFX 526 Y 7
SFX 526 0 Ah/166 . 233
SFX 526 0 AhmA/166 . 233
SFX 526 0 Ahm/166 . 233
SFX 526 0 AhA/166 . 233
SFX 526 0 Ahn/166 . 233
SFX 526 0 Any/166 . 233
SFX 526 0 AnA/166 . 233
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 0/198 . 228
